Utah statutes.
17-50-310.   County powers regarding property, water rights, and water facilities -- Retainage.

(1) A county may:

(a)  purchase, receive by donation, or lease any real or personal property or water rights necessary for the use of the county;

(b)  purchase or otherwise acquire the necessary real estate upon which to sink wells to obtain water for sprinkling roads and for other county purposes and erect thereon pumping apparatus, tanks, and reservoirs for obtaining and storing water for such purposes and preserve, take care of, manage, and control that real estate and those facilities;

(c)  purchase, receive by donation, or lease any water rights or stock or rights in reservoirs or storage companies or associations for the use of citizens of the county;

(d)  construct dams and canals for the storage and distribution of waters referred to in Subsection (1)(c); and

(e)  fix the price for and sell water, water rights, stock, or rights in reservoir or storage companies or associations, with the dams and canals, as are not required for public use to citizens of the county.

(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to construct dams and canals under this section is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

